Maryland, session 2026, SB0328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Cohabitant” means an individual who for a period of at least 180 days
in the year before the death of a fallen public safety officer [or judicial officer]:
(i) had a relationship of mutual interdependence with the fallen
public safety officer [or judicial officer]; and
(ii) resided with the fallen public safety officer [or judicial officer] in
the dwelling.
(3) “Disabled public safety officer [or judicial officer”]” means an individual
who:
(i) has been found to be permanently and totally disabled by an
administrative body or court of competent jurisdiction authorized to make such a
determination; and
(ii) became disabled:
1. as a result of or in the course of employment as a law
enforcement officer[,] OR a correctional officer[, or a judicial officer]; or
2. [while in active service as a judicial officer or] while in the
active service of a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, unless the disability was the
result of the individual’s own willful misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs.
(4) (i) “Dwelling” means real property that:

SENATE BILL 328 3
1. is the legal residence of a disabled public safety officer [or
judicial officer], a surviving spouse, or a cohabitant; and
2. is occupied by not more than two families.
(ii) “Dwelling” includes the lot or curtilage and structures necessary
to use the real property as a residence.
(5) “Fallen public safety officer [or judicial officer”]” means [an individual
who dies]:
(i) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DIES as a result of or in the course of
employment as a law enforcement officer[,] OR a correctional officer[, or a judicial officer];
[or]
(ii) [while in active service as a judicial officer or] AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO DIES WHILE IN SERVICE AS A JUDICIAL OFFICER OR while in the active service of
a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, unless the death was the result of the
individual’s own willful misconduct or abuse of alcohol or drugs; OR
(III) A DISABLED PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER WHO DIES
REGARDLESS OF THE CAUSE OF DEATH.
(6) “Public safety officer” means a correctional officer, a law enforcement
officer, or a member of a fire, rescue, or emergency medical service, as those terms are
defined, by law, by the county or municipal corporation as required under subsection (c) of
this section.
(7) “Surviving spouse” means a surviving spouse, who has not remarried,
of a fallen public safety officer [or judicial officer].
(b) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of
a county or municipal corporation may grant, by law, a property tax credit under this
section against the county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on a dwelling
that is owned by a disabled public safety officer [or judicial officer], a surviving spouse, or
a cohabitant:
[(1)] (I) if the dwelling was owned by the disabled public safety officer [or
judicial officer] at the time the public safety officer [or judicial officer] was adjudged to be
permanently and totally disabled or by the fallen public safety officer [or judicial officer] at
the time of the fallen public safety officer’s [or judicial officer’s] death;
[(2)] (II) if the disabled public safety officer [or judicial officer] was
domiciled in the State as of, or any time within the 5 years before, the date the disabled

SENATE BILL 328
public safety officer [or judicial officer] was adjudged to be permanently and totally
disabled or the fallen public safety officer [or judicial officer], the surviving spouse, or the
cohabitant was domiciled in the State as of, or any time within the 5 years before, the date
of the fallen public safety officer’s [or judicial officer’s] death and the dwelling was acquired
by the disabled public safety officer [or judicial officer within 10 years of the date] AFTER
the disabled public safety officer [or judicial officer] was adjudged to be permanently and
totally disabled or by the surviving spouse or cohabitant [within 10 years of] AFTER the
fallen public safety officer’s [or judicial officer’s] death; OR
[(3)] (III) if the dwelling was owned by the surviving spouse or cohabitant
at the time of the fallen public safety officer’s [or judicial officer’s] death[; or].
[(4)] (2) [if the] FOR A dwelling THAT was acquired after [the] A disabled
public safety officer [or judicial officer], [the] A surviving spouse, or [the] A cohabitant
qualified for a credit for a former dwelling under [item (1), (2), or (3)] PARAGRAPH (1) of
this subsection, [to the extent of the previous credit] THE CREDIT SHALL MAY BE
GRANTED FOR THE NEWLY ACQUIRED DWELLING IN AN AMOUNT THAT REDUCES THE
PROPERTY TAXES OWED ON THE NEWLY ACQUIRED DWELLING BY THE SAME
PROPORTION AS THE CREDIT REDUCED THE PROPERTY TAXES ON THE FORMER
DWELLING.
(3) FOR A CREDIT GRANTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE AMOUNT OF PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON THE
DWELLING INCREASES DURING A TAXABLE YEAR OCCURRING AFTER THE CREDIT IS
INITIALLY GRANTED, THE CREDIT FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR MAY BE GRANTED IN AN
AMOUNT THAT REDUCES THE PROPERTY TAXES OWED ON THE DWELLING BY THE
SAME PROPORTION AS THE INITIAL CREDIT REDUCED THE PROPERTY TAXES ON THE
DWELLING.
(c) A county or municipal corporation:
(1) shall define, by law, who is a[:
(i)] public safety officer; and
[(ii) judicial officer; and]
(2) may [provide], by law[, for]:
(i) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (A)(5)(III) OF THIS
SECTION, LIMIT ELIGIBILITY FOR THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION TO
INDIVIDUALS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(5)(I) AND (II) OF THIS SECTION;

SENATE BILL 328 5
(II) ESTABLISH the amount and duration of a property tax credit
allowed under this section;
[(ii)] (III) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, PROVIDE FOR any [additional] limitation to the number of years the dwelling
was acquired within the date of an adjudication of disability or death; and
[(iii)] (IV) PROVIDE FOR any other provision necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
9–210.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COHABITANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO FOR A PERIOD OF AT
LEAST 180 DAYS IN THE YEAR BEFORE THE DEATH OF A FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER:
(I) HAD A RELATIONSHIP OF MUTUAL INTERDEPENDENCE
WITH THE FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER; AND
(II) RESIDED WITH THE FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER IN THE
DWELLING.
(3) “DISABLED JUDICIAL OFFICER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) HAS BEEN FOUND TO BE PERMANENTLY AND TOTALLY
DISABLED BY AN ADMINISTRATIVE BODY OR COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION
AUTHORIZED TO MAKE SUCH A DETERMINATION; AND
(II) BECAME DISABLED:
1. AS A RESULT OF OR IN THE COURSE OF EMPLOYMENT
AS A JUDICIAL OFFICER; OR
2. WHILE IN ACTIVE SERVICE AS A JUDICIAL OFFICER,
UNLESS THE DISABILITY WAS THE RESULT OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S OWN WILLFUL
MISCONDUCT OR ABUSE OF ALCOHOL OR DRUGS.
(4) (I) “DWELLING” MEANS REAL PROPERTY THAT:
1. IS THE LEGAL RESIDENCE OF A DISABLED JUDICIAL
OFFICER, A SURVIVING SPOUSE, OR A COHABITANT; AND

SENATE BILL 328
2. IS OCCUPIED BY NOT MORE THAN TWO FAMILIES.
(II) “DWELLING” INCLUDES THE LOT OR CURTILAGE AND
STRUCTURES NECESSARY TO USE THE REAL PROPERTY AS A RESIDENCE.
(5) “FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO DIES:
(I) AS A RESULT OF OR IN THE COURSE OF EMPLOYMENT AS A
JUDICIAL OFFICER; OR
(II) WHILE IN ACTIVE SERVICE AS A JUDICIAL OFFICER, UNLESS
THE DEATH WAS THE RESULT OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S OWN WILLFUL MISCONDUCT OR
ABUSE OF ALCOHOL OR DRUGS.
(6) “SURVIVING SPOUSE” MEANS A SURVIVING SPOUSE, WHO HAS NOT
REMARRIED, OF A FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY GRANT, BY LAW,
A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON A DWELLING THAT IS
OWNED BY A DISABLED JUDICIAL OFFICER, A SURVIVING SPOUSE, OR A
COHABITANT:
(1) IF THE DWELLING WAS OWNED BY THE DISABLED JUDICIAL
OFFICER AT THE TIME THE JUDICIAL OFFICER WAS ADJUDGED TO BE PERMANENTLY
AND TOTALLY DISABLED OR BY THE FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE
FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER’S DEATH;
(2) IF THE DISABLED JUDICIAL OFFICER WAS DOMICILED IN THE
STATE AS OF, OR ANY TIME WITHIN THE 5 YEARS BEFORE, THE DATE THE DISABLED
JUDICIAL OFFICER WAS ADJUDGED TO BE PERMANENTLY AND TOTALLY DISABLED
OR THE FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER, THE SURVIVING SPOUSE, OR THE COHABITANT
WAS DOMICILED IN THE STATE AS OF, OR ANY TIME WITHIN THE 5 YEARS BEFORE,
THE DATE OF THE FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER’S DEATH AND THE DWELLING WAS
ACQUIRED BY THE DISABLED JUDICIAL OFFICER WITHIN 10 YEARS AFTER THE DATE
THE DISABLED JUDICIAL OFFICER WAS ADJUDGED TO BE PERMANENTLY AND
TOTALLY DISABLED OR BY THE SURVIVING SPOUSE OR COHABITANT WITHIN 10
YEARS AFTER THE FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER’S DEATH;
(3) IF THE DWELLING WAS OWNED BY THE SURVIVING SPOUSE OR
COHABITANT AT THE TIME OF THE FALLEN JUDICIAL OFFICER’S DEATH; OR

SENATE BILL 328 7
(4) IF THE DWELLING WAS ACQUIRED AFTER THE DISABLED JUDICIAL
OFFICER, THE SURVIVING SPOUSE, OR THE COHABITANT QUALIFIED FOR A CREDIT
FOR A FORMER DWELLING UNDER ITEM (1), (2), OR (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TO THE
EXTENT OF THE PREVIOUS CREDIT.
(C) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION:
(1) SHALL DEFINE, BY LAW, WHO IS A JUDICIAL OFFICER; AND
(2) MAY PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:
(I) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT
ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) ANY ADDITIONAL LIMITATION TO THE NUMBER OF YEARS
THE DWELLING WAS ACQUIRED WITHIN THE DATE OF AN ADJUDICATION OF
DISABILITY OR DEATH; AND
(III) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.